Missouri, session 2026, HB2858.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 67.140 and 442.404, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 67.140 and 442.404, to read as follows:
67.140. 1. No political subdivision of the state nor any local government, city or
county, or any agency, authority, board, commission, department, or officer thereof[,] shall
enact any ordinance or promulgate or issue any regulation, rule, policy, guideline, or
proclamation describing the relationship between persons and domestic animals as other than
persons may or can own domestic animals.
2. No political subdivision of the state nor any local government, city or county,
or any agency, authority, board, commission, department, or officer thereof shall enact
any ordinance or promulgate or issue any regulation, rule, policy, guideline, or
proclamation that prohibit or have the effect of prohibiting ownership or pasturing of
non-nuisance animals for personal consumption on a lot that is one-third of an acre or
larger, including prohibitions against a single enclosure designed to safely and humanely
house up to eight animals. Such entity may enact reasonable ordinances or adopt
reasonable regulations, rules, polices, guidelines, or proclamations regarding ownership
or pasturing of non-nuisance animals, including a prohibition or restriction on
ownership or pasturing of roosters.
3. For purposes of this section, "non-nuisance domesticated animals for
consumption" means domesticated animals generally raised for meat, milk, or other
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2858 2
consumable product that do not produce unreasonable odor, noise, or safety hazard for
surrounding properties. Such term includes, but is not limited to, chickens, rabbits, and
quail.
442.404. 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Homeowners' association", a nonprofit corporation or unincorporated association
of homeowners created under a declaration to own and operate portions of a planned
community or other residential subdivision that has the power under the declaration to assess
association members to pay the costs and expenses incurred in the performance of the
association's obligations under the declaration or tenants-in-common with respect to the
ownership of common ground or amenities of a planned community or other residential
subdivision. This term shall not include a condominium unit owners' association as defined
and provided for in subdivision (3) of section 448.1-103 or a residential cooperative;
(2) "Non-nuisance domesticated animals for consumption", domesticated
animals generally raised for meat, milk, or other consumable product that do not
produce unreasonable odor, noise, or safety hazard for surrounding properties. Such
term includes, but is not limited to, chickens, rabbits, and quail;
(3) "Political signs", any fixed, ground-mounted display in support of or in opposition
to a person seeking elected office or a ballot measure excluding any materials that may be
attached;
[(3)] (4) "Solar panel or solar collector", a device used to collect and convert solar
energy into electricity or thermal energy, including but not limited to photovoltaic cells or
panels, or solar thermal systems.
2. (1) No deed restrictions, covenants, or similar binding agreements running with
the land shall prohibit or have the effect of prohibiting the display of political signs.
(2) A homeowners' association has the authority to adopt reasonable rules, subject to
any applicable statutes or ordinances, regarding the time, size, place, number, and manner of
display of political signs.
(3) A homeowners' association may remove a political sign without liability if such
sign is placed within the common ground, threatens the public health or safety, violates an
applicable statute or ordinance, is accompanied by sound or music, or if any other materials
are attached to the political sign. Subject to the foregoing, a homeowners' association shall
not remove a political sign from the property of a homeowner or impose any fine or penalty
upon the homeowner unless it has given such homeowner three days after providing written
notice to the homeowner, which notice shall specifically identify the rule and the nature of the
violation.

HB 2858 3
3. (1) No deed restrictions, covenants, or similar binding agreements running with
the land shall limit or prohibit, or have the effect of limiting or prohibiting, the installation of
solar panels or solar collectors on the rooftop of any property or structure.
(2) A homeowners' association may adopt reasonable rules, subject to any applicable
statutes or ordinances, regarding the placement of solar panels or solar collectors to the extent
that those rules do not prevent the installation of the device, impair the functioning of the
device, restrict the use of the device, or adversely affect the cost or efficiency of the device.
(3) The provisions of this subsection shall apply only with regard to rooftops that are
owned, controlled, and maintained by the owner of the individual property or structure.
4. (1) No deed restrictions, covenants, or similar binding agreements running with
the land shall prohibit or have the effect of prohibiting the display of sale signs on the
property of a homeowner or property owner including, but not limited to, any yard on the
property, or nearby street corners.
(2) A homeowners' association has the authority to adopt reasonable rules, subject to
any applicable statutes or ordinances, regarding the time, size, place, number, and manner of
display of sale signs.
(3) A homeowners' association may remove a sale sign without liability if such sign is
placed within the common ground, threatens the public health or safety, violates an applicable
statute or ordinance, is accompanied by sound or music, or if any other materials are attached
to the sale sign. Subject to the foregoing, a homeowners' association shall not remove a sale
sign from the property of a homeowner or property owner or impose any fine or penalty upon
the homeowner or property owner unless it has given such homeowner or property owner
three business days after the homeowner or property owner receives written notice from the
homeowners' association, which notice shall specifically identify the rule and the nature of
the alleged violation.
5. (1) No deed restrictions, covenants, or similar binding agreements running with
the land shall prohibit or have the effect of prohibiting ownership or pasturing of [up to six
chickens] non-nuisance animals for personal consumptionon a lot that is [two-tenths] one-
third of an acre or larger, including prohibitions against a single [chicken coop designed to
accommodate up to six chickens] enclosure designed to safely and humanely house up to
eight animals.
(2) A homeowners' association may adopt reasonable rules, subject to applicable
statutes or ordinances, regarding ownership or pasturing of [chickens] non-nuisance
animals, including a prohibition or restriction on ownership or pasturing of roosters.
✔